Wyoming, session 2025, SF0061.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-11-1103 is amended to read:
35-11-1103. Property exempt from ad valorem taxation.
The following property is exempt from ad valorem taxation
pursuant to the provisions of this act and includes
facilities, installations, machinery or equipment attached
or unattached to real property and designed, installed and
utilized primarily for the elimination, control or
prevention of air, water or land pollution, or in the event
such facility, installation, equipment or machinery shall
also serve other beneficial purposes and use, such portion
of the assessed valuation thereof as may be reasonably
calculated to be necessary for and devoted to elimination,
control or prevention of air, water and land pollution. The
department of revenue shall determine the exempt portion on
all property assessed pursuant to W.S. 39-13-102(m). The
county assessor shall determine the exempt portion on all
property assessed pursuant to W.S. 39-13-103(b). The
determination shall not include as exempt any portion of
any facilities which have value as the specific source of
marketable byproducts or facilities constructed for the
sole purpose of capturing nonpoint source carbon dioxide.
Section 2. The department of revenue shall promulgate
any rules necessary to implement this act.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0061
ENROLLED ACT NO. 25, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2